Florida, session 2026, SB178.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 20 21 Section 1.âPresent paragraphs (c) through (n) of subsection 22 (2) of section 1006.20, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as 23 paragraphs (d) through (o), respectively, and a new paragraph 24 (c) is added to that subsection, to read: 25 1006.20âAthletics in public K-12 schools.â 26 (2)âADOPTION OF BYLAWS, POLICIES, OR GUIDELINES.â 27 (c)âThe FHSAA shall adopt bylaws that authorize the head 28 coach of an athletic team to support the welfare of a student he 29 or she coaches only by using personal funds to provide, in good 30 faith, effects such as food, transportation, and recovery 31 services. The bylaws must require a parent to provide written 32 consent before a head coach may provide such effects to a 33 student. The bylaws must also restrict such use of funds to one 34 head coach per athletic team. 35 1.âA head coach who uses personal funds to provide such 36 effects must report such use to the FHSAA in a manner provided 37 by FHSAA bylaw. 38 2.âSuch use of personal funds is presumed not to be an 39 impermissible benefit, unless such use of personal funds is: 40 a.âNot reported; 41 b.âReported and deemed not to be in good faith by the 42 FHSAA; or 43 c.âUsed for recruiting purposes. 44 3.âThe maximum amount of personal funds a head coach may 45 use per athletic team per year is $15,000. 46 47 Any other organization governing interscholastic athletic 48 competition in this state may adopt bylaws similar to those 49 required by this paragraph. 50 Section 2.âSubsection (3) of section 768.135, Florida 51 Statutes, is amended to read: 52 768.135âVolunteer team physicians; immunity.â 53 (3)âA practitioner licensed under chapter 458, chapter 459, 54 chapter 460, or s. 464.012 or registered under s. 464.0123 who 55 gratuitously and in good faith conducts an evaluation pursuant 56 to s. 1006.20(2)(d) s. 1006.20(2)(c) is not liable for any civil 57 damages arising from that evaluation unless the evaluation was 58 conducted in a wrongful manner. 59 Section 3.âParagraph (b) of subsection (17) of section 60 1002.20, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 61 1002.20âK-12 student and parent rights.âParents of public 62 school students must receive accurate and timely information 63 regarding their childâs academic progress and must be informed 64 of ways they can help their child to succeed in school. K-12 65 students and their parents are afforded numerous statutory 66 rights including, but not limited to, the following: 67 (17)âATHLETICS; PUBLIC HIGH SCHOOL.â 68 (b)âMedical evaluation and electrocardiogram.âBefore 69 participating in athletics, students must: 70 1.âSatisfactorily pass a medical evaluation each year, 71 unless the parent objects in writing based on religious tenets 72 or practices, in accordance with s. 1006.20(2)(e) s. 73 1006.20(2)(d); and 74 2.âAs applicable under s. 1006.20, receive an 75 electrocardiogram, unless the parent objects in writing based on 76 religious tenets or practices or secures a certificate of 77 medical exception in accordance with s. 1006.20(2)(e) s. 78 1006.20(2)(d) or the school district is unable to obtain a 79 public or private partnership for the provision of an 80 electrocardiogram pursuant to s. 1006.165. 81 Section 4.âSubsection (3) of section 1006.165, Florida 82 Statutes, is amended to read: 83 1006.165âWell-being of students participating in 84 extracurricular activities; training.â 85 (3)âEach school district must pursue public and private 86 partnerships to provide low-cost electrocardiograms to the 87 student. A student athlete is exempt from the requirement in s. 88 1006.20(2)(d)4. s. 1006.20(2)(c)4. if he or she resides in a 89 school district that is unable to obtain a public or private 90 partnership to provide an electrocardiogram at a rate of less 91 than $50 per student. 92 Section 5.âParagraph (g) of subsection (2) of section 93 1012.468, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 94 1012.468âExceptions to certain fingerprinting and criminal 95 history checks.â 96 (2)âA district school board shall exempt from the screening 97 requirements set forth in ss. 1012.465 and 1012.467 the 98 following noninstructional contractors: 99 (g)âAn investigator for the Florida High School Athletic 100 Association (FHSAA) who meets the requirements under s. 101 1006.20(2)(f) s. 1006.20(2)(e). 102 Section 6.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.